Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.125

License—Inactive status.

(1) An individual may place his or her license on inactive status. The holder of an inactive license shall not practice podiatric medicine and surgery in this state without first activating the license.

(2) The inactive renewal fee shall be established by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250, but may not exceed twenty-five percent of the active license renewal fee. Failure to renew an inactive license results in cancellation in the same manner as an active license.

(3) An inactive license may be placed in an active status upon compliance with the rules established by the board.

(4) The provisions of this chapter relating to the denial, suspension, and revocation of a license are applicable to an inactive license, except that when proceedings to suspend or revoke an inactive license have been initiated, the license remains inactive until the proceedings have been completed.

[ 1990 c 147 s 14.]